public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.aff
PFX g N 714
PFX g 0 ב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ב וו
PFX g 0 ב" .
PFX g 0 בו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 בכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 בכ וו
PFX g 0 בכ" .
PFX g 0 בכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ו .
PFX g 0 ו" .
PFX g 0 וב [^ו]
PFX g 0 וב וו
PFX g 0 וב" .
PFX g 0 ובו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ובכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ובכ וו
PFX g 0 ובכ" .
PFX g 0 ובכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכ וו
PFX g 0 וכ" .
PFX g 0 וכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכב וו
PFX g 0 וכב" .
PFX g 0 וכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וככ וו
PFX g 0 וככ" .
PFX g 0 וככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכל וו
PFX g 0 וכל" .
PFX g 0 וכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכמ וו
PFX g 0 וכמ" .
PFX g 0 וכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשב וו
PFX g 0 וכשב" .
PFX g 0 וכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשבכ וו
PFX g 0 וכשבכ" .
PFX g 0 וכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשכ וו
PFX g 0 וכשכ" .
PFX g 0 וכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשכב וו
PFX g 0 וכשכב" .
PFX g 0 וכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשככ וו
PFX g 0 וכשככ" .
PFX g 0 וכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשכל וו
PFX g 0 וכשכל" .
PFX g 0 וכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשכמ וו
PFX g 0 וכשכמ" .
PFX g 0 וכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשל וו
PFX g 0 וכשל" .
PFX g 0 וכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשלכ וו
PFX g 0 וכשלכ" .
PFX g 0 וכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשמ וו
PFX g 0 וכשמ" .
PFX g 0 וכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 וכשמכ וו
PFX g 0 וכשמכ" .
PFX g 0 וכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ול [^ו]
PFX g 0 ול וו
PFX g 0 ול" .
PFX g 0 ולו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכ וו
PFX g 0 ולכ" .
PFX g 0 ולכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשב וו
PFX g 0 ולכשב" .
PFX g 0 ולכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשבכ וו
PFX g 0 ולכשבכ" .
PFX g 0 ולכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשכ וו
PFX g 0 ולכשכ" .
PFX g 0 ולכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשכב וו
PFX g 0 ולכשכב" .
PFX g 0 ולכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשככ וו
PFX g 0 ולכשככ" .
PFX g 0 ולכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשכל וו
PFX g 0 ולכשכל" .
PFX g 0 ולכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשכמ וו
PFX g 0 ולכשכמ" .
PFX g 0 ולכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשל וו
PFX g 0 ולכשל" .
PFX g 0 ולכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשלכ וו
PFX g 0 ולכשלכ" .
PFX g 0 ולכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשמ וו
PFX g 0 ולכשמ" .
PFX g 0 ולכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ולכשמכ וו
PFX g 0 ולכשמכ" .
PFX g 0 ולכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומ וו
PFX g 0 ומ" .
PFX g 0 ומו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומכ וו
PFX g 0 ומכ" .
PFX g 0 ומכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשב וו
PFX g 0 ומשב" .
PFX g 0 ומשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשבכ וו
PFX g 0 ומשבכ" .
PFX g 0 ומשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשכ וו
PFX g 0 ומשכ" .
PFX g 0 ומשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשכב וו
PFX g 0 ומשכב" .
PFX g 0 ומשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשככ וו
PFX g 0 ומשככ" .
PFX g 0 ומשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשכל וו
PFX g 0 ומשכל" .
PFX g 0 ומשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשכמ וו
PFX g 0 ומשכמ" .
PFX g 0 ומשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשל וו
PFX g 0 ומשל" .
PFX g 0 ומשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשלכ וו
PFX g 0 ומשלכ" .
PFX g 0 ומשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשמ וו
PFX g 0 ומשמ" .
PFX g 0 ומשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ומשמכ וו
PFX g 0 ומשמכ" .
PFX g 0 ומשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושב וו
PFX g 0 ושב" .
PFX g 0 ושבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושבכ וו
PFX g 0 ושבכ" .
PFX g 0 ושבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכ וו
PFX g 0 ושכ" .
PFX g 0 ושכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכב וו
PFX g 0 ושכב" .
PFX g 0 ושכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושככ וו
PFX g 0 ושככ" .
PFX g 0 ושככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכל וו
PFX g 0 ושכל" .
PFX g 0 ושכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכמ וו
PFX g 0 ושכמ" .
PFX g 0 ושכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשב וו
PFX g 0 ושכשב" .
PFX g 0 ושכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשבכ וו
PFX g 0 ושכשבכ" .
PFX g 0 ושכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשכ וו
PFX g 0 ושכשכ" .
PFX g 0 ושכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשכב וו
PFX g 0 ושכשכב" .
PFX g 0 ושכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשככ וו
PFX g 0 ושכשככ" .
PFX g 0 ושכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשכל וו
PFX g 0 ושכשכל" .
PFX g 0 ושכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשכמ וו
PFX g 0 ושכשכמ" .
PFX g 0 ושכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשל וו
PFX g 0 ושכשל" .
PFX g 0 ושכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשלכ וו
PFX g 0 ושכשלכ" .
PFX g 0 ושכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשמ וו
PFX g 0 ושכשמ" .
PFX g 0 ושכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושכשמכ וו
PFX g 0 ושכשמכ" .
PFX g 0 ושכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושל וו
PFX g 0 ושל" .
PFX g 0 ושלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכ וו
PFX g 0 ושלכ" .
PFX g 0 ושלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשב וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשב" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשבכ וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשבכ" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשכ וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשכ" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשכב וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשכב" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשככ וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשככ" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשכל וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשכל" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשכמ וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשכמ" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשל וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשל" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשלכ וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשלכ" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשמ וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשמ" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושלכשמכ וו
PFX g 0 ושלכשמכ" .
PFX g 0 ושלכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמ וו
PFX g 0 ושמ" .
PFX g 0 ושמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמכ וו
PFX g 0 ושמכ" .
PFX g 0 ושמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשב וו
PFX g 0 ושמשב" .
PFX g 0 ושמשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשבכ וו
PFX g 0 ושמשבכ" .
PFX g 0 ושמשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשכ וו
PFX g 0 ושמשכ" .
PFX g 0 ושמשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשכב וו
PFX g 0 ושמשכב" .
PFX g 0 ושמשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשככ וו
PFX g 0 ושמשככ" .
PFX g 0 ושמשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשכל וו
PFX g 0 ושמשכל" .
PFX g 0 ושמשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשכמ וו
PFX g 0 ושמשכמ" .
PFX g 0 ושמשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשל וו
PFX g 0 ושמשל" .
PFX g 0 ושמשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשלכ וו
PFX g 0 ושמשלכ" .
PFX g 0 ושמשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשמ וו
PFX g 0 ושמשמ" .
PFX g 0 ושמשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ושמשמכ וו
PFX g 0 ושמשמכ" .
PFX g 0 ושמשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כ [^ו]
PFX g 0 כ וו
PFX g 0 כ" .
PFX g 0 כו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כב [^ו]
PFX g 0 כב וו
PFX g 0 כב" .
PFX g 0 כבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 ככ וו
PFX g 0 ככ" .
PFX g 0 ככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כל [^ו]
PFX g 0 כל וו
PFX g 0 כל" .
PFX g 0 כלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 כמ וו
PFX g 0 כמ" .
PFX g 0 כמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשב וו
PFX g 0 כשב" .
PFX g 0 כשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשבכ וו
PFX g 0 כשבכ" .
PFX g 0 כשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשכ וו
PFX g 0 כשכ" .
PFX g 0 כשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשכב וו
PFX g 0 כשכב" .
PFX g 0 כשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשככ וו
PFX g 0 כשככ" .
PFX g 0 כשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשכל וו
PFX g 0 כשכל" .
PFX g 0 כשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשכמ וו
PFX g 0 כשכמ" .
PFX g 0 כשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשל וו
PFX g 0 כשל" .
PFX g 0 כשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשלכ וו
PFX g 0 כשלכ" .
PFX g 0 כשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשמ וו
PFX g 0 כשמ" .
PFX g 0 כשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 כשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 כשמכ וו
PFX g 0 כשמכ" .
PFX g 0 כשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 ל [^ו]
PFX g 0 ל וו
PFX g 0 ל" .
PFX g 0 לו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכ וו
PFX g 0 לכ" .
PFX g 0 לכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשב וו
PFX g 0 לכשב" .
PFX g 0 לכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשבכ וו
PFX g 0 לכשבכ" .
PFX g 0 לכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשכ וו
