public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.dic
אוץ/g
אזן/g
אזנני/g
אחדו/g
אחדן/g
אחדני/g
אלץ/g
אלצו/g
אלצן/g
אלצני/g
אמנני/g
אמתני/g
ארח/g
אשרני/g
אששה/g
אששם/g
אששנו/g
באס/g
בדר/g
בדרו/g
בזר/g
בזרו/g
בזרן/g
בזרני/g
בטאו/g
בטאן/g
בטאני/g
בטחם/g
בטחני/g
בטלם/g
בלוש/g
בסם/g
בסמו/g
בסמן/g
בסמני/g
בססה/g
בססם/g
בססנו/g
בערם/g
בערני/g
בצען/g
בצרם/g
בצרני/g
בקרני/g
בקשו/g
בקשן/g
בקשני/g
בשלו/g
בשלנו/g
בתק/g
בתרה/g
בתרם/g
בתרנו/g
גבב/g
גבבם/g
גבבנו/g
גבור/g
גבשה/g
גבשם/g
גבשנו/g
גדלם/g
גדלני/g
גדרני/g
גהק/g
גחך/g
גחכו/g
גחכן/g
גחכני/g
גלוש/g
גלחה/g
גלחם/g
גלחנו/g
גלף/g
גסוס/g
גפר/g
גרדן/g
גרוד/g
גרשני/g
דבג/g
דוג/g
דון/g
דונו/g
דוננו/g
דוש/g
דכאה/g
דכאם/g
דכאנו/g
דלוף/g
דמום/g
דפנם/g
דפננו/g
דרגני/g
הגר/g
היאגר/g
היאהד/g
היאות/g
היאזר/g
היאטם/g
היאכף/g
היאלץ/g
היאמן/g
היאנח/g
היאנק/g
היאסר/g
היארג/g
היאשם/g
היבגד/g
היבדק/g
היבוך/g
היבזק/g
היבחש/g
היבלם/g
היבעט/g
היבעת/g
היבצר/g
היברא/g
היגדע/g
היגול/g
היגזל/g
היגזר/g
היגמל/g
היגמר/g
היגנז/g
היגרב/g
היגרס/g
היגרף/g
הידבק/g
הידגם/g
הידון/g
הידחף/g
הידלק/g
הידקר/g
הידרס/g
היהדף/g
היהרג/g
היוואש/g
היווכח/g
היוועד/g
היווצר/g
היוושע/g
היזבח/g
היזון/g
היזלל/g
היזנח/g
היזקף/g
היזרע/g
היחבא/g
היחבל/g
היחגג/g
היחוג/g
היחכר/g
היחלם/g
היחלק/g
היחמד/g
היחנט/g
היחנק/g
היחסם/g
היחפף/g
היחצב/g
היחקק/g
היחרב/g
היחרט/g
היחרץ/g
היחרת/g
היחשד/g
היחשק/g
היחתם/g
היטבל/g
היטחן/g
היטמן/g
היטעם/g
היטפל/g
היטרף/g
היכבל/g
היכון/g
היכחד/g
היכלל/g
היכנס/g
היכסס/g
היכפל/g
היכרת/g
היכתב/g
הילבל/g
הילגם/g
הילחץ/g
הילכד/g
הילעס/g
הילקח/g
הימדד/g
הימוג/g
הימול/g
הימחא/g
הימחץ/g
הימכר/g
הימלט/g
הימלק/g
הימסך/g
הימסר/g
הימען/g
הימק/g
הימרט/g
הימשך/g
הימתח/g
הינבט/g
הינגס/g
הינגף/g
הינזף/g
הינזר/g
הינחת/g
הינטע/g
הינעל/g
הינצל/g
הינקט/g
הינקע/g
הינשך/g
הינתז/g
הינתן/g
היסב/g
היסגר/g
היסוג/g
היסחט/g
היסחר/g
היסכר/g
היסלל/g
היספג/g
היספר/g
היסקר/g
היסרק/g
היסתר/g
היעגן/g
היעזב/g
היעטף/g
היעלב/g
היענב/g
היענש/g
היעצם/g
היעקד/g
היעקץ/g
היערך/g
היערף/g
היעשק/g
היעתר/g
היפגע/g
היפוץ/g
היפלא/g
היפסל/g
היפעם/g
היפצע/g
היפקח/g
היפרט/g
היפרס/g
היפרץ/g
היפרש/g
היפתר/g
היצבע/g
היצוד/g
היצמד/g
היצפר/g
היצרד/g
היצרר/g
היקבץ/g
היקדח/g
היקטל/g
היקטע/g
היקלט/g
היקנס/g
היקצץ/g
היקרא/g
היקרש/g
הירגם/g
הירדם/g
הירחץ/g
הירטט/g
הירכש/g
הירמס/g
הירפא/g
הירקב/g
הירקם/g
הירתם/g
הישאב/g
הישאל/g
הישאר/g
הישבר/g
הישדד/g
הישחט/g
הישטף/g
הישכח/g
הישלח/g
הישלל/g
הישלף/g
הישמד/g
הישמע/g
הישנק/g
הישפט/g
הישקל/g
הישרט/g
הישרף/g
הישתל/g
היתחב/g
היתלש/g
היתפס/g
היתפש/g
היתקע/g
הללה/g
הללן/g
הללני/g
הסס/g
זהם/g
זווגן/g
זוע/g
זלוג/g
זמנני/g
זפתני/g
זקקה/g
זקקם/g
זקקנו/g
זרום/g
חבב/g
חבבו/g
חבבן/g
חבבני/g
חבקני/g
חגוג/g
חדדה/g
חדדם/g
חדדנו/g
חדול/g
חדשם/g
חון/g
חזקו/g
חזקן/g
חזקני/g
חלוב/g
חללני/g
חלצן/g
חלקני/g
חמוק/g
חממו/g
חממן/g
חממני/g
חמשם/g
חמשנו/g
חנוך/g
חסור/g
חסלה/g
חסלם/g
חסלנו/g
חסן/g
חסנם/g
חסננו/g
חפוץ/g
חפשה/g
חפשם/g
חפשנו/g
חצוץ/g
חרוג/g
חרפם/g
חשלה/g
חשלם/g
חשלנו/g
חתור/g
חתלה/g
חתלם/g
חתלנו/g
טבעני/g
טהרם/g
טוס/g
טמאו/g
טמאן/g
טמאני/g
טנפה/g
טנפם/g
טנפנו/g
טעום/g
טפס/g
כבס/g
כבסו/g
כבסן/g
כבסני/g
כוונני/g
כחש/g
כנסני/g
כער/g
כערו/g
כערן/g
כערני/g
כתת/g
להקני/g
לוש/g
לחכם/g
לחכני/g
לטפה/g
לטפם/g
לטפנו/g
לפף/g
לקק/g
לקקו/g
לקקנו/g
מגר/g
מגרם/g
מגרנו/g
מדר/g
מלוך/g
מלטם/g
ממן/g
ממשן/g
מצק/g
מקדן/g
מקמה/g
מקמנו/g
מתגני/g
מתנני/g
נאצן/g
נגוש/g
נהום/g
נהלן/g
נווטני/g
נזול/g
נחמני/g
נמוס/g
נסר/g
נסרן/g
נפצני/g
נפקם/g
נצחני/g
נקדו/g
נקוף/g
נקזם/g
נשול/g
נשלני/g
נתצה/g
נתצנו/g
סבוב/g
סוב/g
סובני/g
סוך/g
סכלן/g
סכנם/g
סלוד/g
סמלני/g
סמנני/g
סננו/g
סננני/g
סרור/g
סרסם/g
עבוד/g
עדנם/g
עוותני/g
עטר/g
עכבן/g
עכלה/g
עכלנו/g
עלוץ/g
ענגה/g
ענגנו/g
עקל/g
עקלן/g
עקמה/g
עקמנו/g
ערוג/g
פארני/g
פוג/g
פזר/g
פזרנו/g
פטמן/g
פלוט/g
פנקו/g
פנקני/g
פצלו/g
פצלני/g
פשטן/g
פשקו/g
פשקני/g
צוד/g
צטטו/g
צטטני/g
צנן/g
צרום/g
קבול/g
קבצם/g
קדמני/g
קדשנו/g
קזז/g
קזזן/g
קלוד/g
קללן/g
קמטני/g
קנח/g
קנחן/g
קפלני/g
רבד/g
רדד/g
רהטם/g
רוץ/g
רטש/g
רככו/g
רככני/g
רססם/g
רסקני/g
רצד/g
רתקה/g
רתקנו/g
שבצני/g
שגעו/g
שגעני/g
שדלה/g
שדלנו/g
שווקם/g
שוש/g
שחדם/g
שטום/g
שכוך/g
שלמו/g
שלמני/g
שמחני/g
שננו/g
שננני/g
שסף/g
שפדם/g
שפול/g
שפצם/g
שפרו/g
שפרני/g
שקוק/g
שקמנו/g
שקצו/g
שקצני/g
שרור/g
שתפה/g
שתפנו/g
תארן/g
תבלן/g
תחח/g
תעבן/g
תעדה/g
תעש/g
